Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-23,113
General investment strategy.

The general investment strategy for a local government investment pool shall be to invest all funds of eligible entities to accomplish the following objectives, which are listed in order of priority:

(1) Preservation and safety of principal;

(2) Liquidity; and

(3) Yield.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 35.